csv2fst/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_e.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: webinigeyaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: webinigeyan 
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: webinigeyaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: webinigeyang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: webinigeyeg
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: webiniged
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: webinigewaad
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: webinigenid
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: webinigenid
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: webinigeng
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: webinigesiwaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: webinigesiwan 
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: webinigesiwaang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: webinigesiwang
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: webinigesiweg
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: webinigesig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: webinigesigwaa
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: webinigesinig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: webinigesinig
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: webinigesing
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: webinigeyaambaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: webinigeyamban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: webinigeyaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: webinigeyangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: webinigeyegiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: webinigepan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: webinigewaapan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: webinigenipan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: webinigenipan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: webinigengiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: webinigesiwaambaan
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: webinigesiwamban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: webinigesiwaangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: webinigesiwangiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: webinigesiwegiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: webinigesigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: webinigesigwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: webinigesinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: webinigesinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: webinigesingiban
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: webinigewaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: webinigewanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: webinigewaangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: webinigewangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: webinigewegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: webinigegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: webinigewaagwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: webinigenigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: webinigenigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: webinigewiingen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: webinigesiiwaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: webinigesiiwanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: webinigesiiwaangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: webinigesiiwangen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: webinigesiiwegwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: webinigesiigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: webinigesiiwaagwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: webinigesiinigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: webinigesiinigwen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: webinigesiiwiingen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg: webinigewaambaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg: webinigewambanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl: webinigewaangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl: webinigewangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl: webinigewegibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: webinigegobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: webinigewaagobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: webinigenigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: webinigenigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X: webinigewiingibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg: webinigesiiwaambaanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg: webinigesiiwambanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl: webinigesiiwaangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl: webinigesiiwangibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl: webinigesiiwegibanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: webinigesiigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: webinigesiiwaagobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: webinigesiinigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: webinigesiinigobanen
     webinige+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X: webinigesiiwiingibanen
